Utah statutes.
19-6-717.   Used oil collection incentive payment.
(1) (a)  The division shall pay a recycling incentive to registered DIYer used
oil collection centers and curbside collection programs approved by the
executive secretary for each gallon of used oil collected from DIYer used oil
generators on and after July 1, 1994, and transported by a permitted used oil
transporter to a permitted used oil processor, rerefiner, burner, or to
another disposal method authorized by board rule.
(b)  Payment of the incentive is subject to Section 19-6-720 regarding
priorities.
(2)  The board shall by rule establish the amount of the payment, which shall
be $.16 per gallon unless the board determines the incentive should be:
(a)  reduced to ensure adequate funds to meet priorities set in Section
19-6-720 and to reimburse all qualified operations under this section; or
(b)  increased to promote collection of used oil under this part and the funds
are available in the account created under Section 19-6-719 after meeting the
priorities set in Section 19-6-720.
